Wisconsin, session 2025, SB434.
do enact as follows:SB434,11Section 1. 40.51 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB434,3,4240.51 (8) Every health care coverage plan offered by the state under sub. (6) 1shall comply with ss. 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 2632.729, 632.746 (1) to (8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 3632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (3) to (6), 632.885, 4632.89, 632.895 (5m) and (8) to (17), and 632.896.SB434,25Section 2. 40.51 (8m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB434,3,9640.51 (8m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance 7board under sub. (7) shall comply with ss. 631.95, 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (1) to 8(8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 9632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.885, 632.89, and 632.895 (11) to (17).SB434,310Section 3. 66.0137 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB434,3,171166.0137 (4) Self-insured health plans. If a city, including a 1st class city, 12or a village provides health care benefits under its home rule power, or if a town 13provides health care benefits, to its officers and employees on a self-insured basis, 14the self-insured plan shall comply with ss. 49.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 15632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and (b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.848, 16632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 17632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).SB434,418Section 4. 120.13 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB434,3,2219120.13 (2) (g) Every self-insured plan under par. (b) shall comply with ss. 2049.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and 21(b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 22632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).SB434,523Section 5. 185.983 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB434,4,724185.983 (1) (intro.) Every voluntary nonprofit health care plan operated by a 1cooperative association organized under s. 185.981 shall be exempt from chs. 600 to 2646, with the exception of ss. 601.04, 601.13, 601.31, 601.41, 601.42, 601.43, 601.44, 3601.45, 611.26, 611.67, 619.04, 623.11, 623.12, 628.34 (10), 631.17, 631.89, 631.93, 4631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.745 to 632.749, 632.775, 632.79, 632.795, 5632.798, 632.848, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (2) to (6), 6632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (5) and (8) to (17), 632.896, and 632.897 (10) and chs. 609, 7620, 630, 635, 645, and 646, but the sponsoring association shall:SB434,68Section 6. 609.815 of the statutes is created to read:SB434,4,119609.815 Prior authorization regulation and transparency. Limited 10service health organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans 11are subject to s. 632.848.SB434,712Section 7. 632.848 of the statutes is created to read:SB434,4,1413632.848 Prior authorization regulation and transparency. (1) 14Definitions. In this section:SB434,4,1815(a) “Adverse determination” means a decision by a utilization review entity 16that health care services provided or proposed to be provided to an enrollee are not 17medically necessary, or are experimental or investigational, and that benefit 18coverage is therefore denied, reduced, or terminated.SB434,4,2219(b) “Authorization” means a determination made by a utilization review entity 20that a health care service has been reviewed and, based on the information 21provided, satisfies the utilization review entity’s requirements for medical necessity 22and appropriateness and that payment will be made for the health care service.SB434,4,2323(c) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.745 (11).SB434,5,324(d) “Health care service” means a health care procedure, treatment, or service 1that is provided by a facility licensed in this state or that is provided by a health 2care provider within the scope of his or her practice. “Health care service” includes 3the provision of pharmaceutical products or durable medical equipment.SB434,5,44(e) “Physician” has the meaning given in s. 448.01 (5).SB434,5,75(f) “Physician assistant” means a person who is licensed as a physician 6assistant under subch. IX of ch. 448 or who holds a compact privilege under subch. 7XIII of ch. 448.SB434,5,148(g) “Prior authorization” means the process by which utilization review 9entities determine the medical necessity or medical appropriateness of an 10otherwise covered health care service prior to the rendering of the health care 11service. “Prior authorization” includes any health benefit plan's, self-insured 12health plan's, or utilization review entity's requirement that an enrollee or health 13care provider notify the health benefit plan or utilization review entity prior to 14receiving or providing a health care service.SB434,5,1715(h) “Enrollee” means an individual eligible to receive health care benefits 16under a health benefit plan or a self-ensured health plan. “Enrollee” includes an 17enrollee’s legally authorized representative.SB434,5,1818(i) “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.85 (1) (c).SB434,5,2219(j) 1. “Urgent health care service” means a health care service that, in the 20opinion of a physician with knowledge of the enrollee's medical condition, must be 21provided sooner than the deadline for prior authorization under sub. (3) to avoid 22any of the following results for the enrollee:SB434,5,2423a. Serious jeopardy to life, health, or the ability to regain maximum bodily 24function.SB434,6,21b. Severe pain that cannot be adequately managed without the care or 2treatment that is the subject of the prior authorization.SB434,6,432. “Urgent health care service” includes mental and behavioral health 4services.SB434,6,553. “Urgent health care service” does not include emergency services.SB434,6,76(k) “Utilization review entity” means any person that performs prior 7authorizations for any of the following:SB434,6,881. An insurer that writes health care liability insurance in this state.SB434,6,1192. A preferred provider plan, as defined in s. s. 609.01 (4), a defined network 10plan, as defined ins. 609.01 (1b), or a limited service health organization, as defined 11in s. 609.01 (3).SB434,6,14123. Any other person that provides, offers to provide, or administers hospital, 13outpatient, medical, prescription drug, or other health benefits to an individual in 14this state.SB434,6,1715(2) Personnel qualified to make adverse determinations. A utilization 16review entity shall ensure that all adverse determinations are made by a health 17care provider who satisfies all of the following criteria:SB434,6,2018(a) The health care provider is a physician, a physician assistant, or an 19advanced practice registered nurse who may issue prescription orders under s. 20441.09 (2).SB434,7,221(b) The health care provider makes the adverse determination under the 22clinical direction of one of the utilization review entity’s medical directors who is 23responsible for the provision of health care services provided to enrollees in this 1state. All of the utilization review entity’s medical directors shall be physicians 2licensed in this state.SB434,7,103(3) Obligations of utilization review entity in nonurgent 4circumstances. Subject to sub. (4), a utilization review entity shall render an 5authorization or adverse determination, and notify the enrollee and the enrollee’s 6health care provider of the authorization or adverse determination, within 72 hours 7of obtaining all necessary information to render the authorization or adverse 8determination. For purposes of this subsection, “necessary information” includes 9the results of any face-to-face clinical evaluation or second opinion that may be 10required.SB434,7,1611(4) Obligations of utilization review entity in urgent circumstances. 12A utilization review entity shall render an authorization or adverse determination 13concerning an urgent health care service, and notify the enrollee and the enrollee’s 14health care provider of the authorization or adverse determination, not later than 1524 hours after receiving all necessary information to render the authorization or 16adverse determination.SB434,7,2217(5) Duration of authorization. Subject to sub. (6), an authorization shall 18be valid for no less than one year from the date that a health care provider receives 19the authorization and the authorization shall remain effective regardless of any 20changes in form, dosage, or method of administration for a prescription drug 21prescribed by the health care provider and regardless of any changes in frequency, 22extent, or duration for a health care service provided by the health care provider.SB434,8,223(6) Duration of authorization for treatment of chronic or long-term 24care conditions. (a) In this subsection, “chronic or long-term care condition” 1means a medical condition that has persisted for at least one year and continues to 2persist after reasonable efforts have been made to relieve or cure its cause.SB434,8,63(b) An authorization for a health care service that is a treatment of a chronic 4or long-term care condition shall remain valid for the duration of the treatment and 5the utilization review entity may not require the enrollee to obtain an authorization 6again for the treatment. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb434 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb434 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB434 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB434 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB434: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting